lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_semiFinalE-noHop.txt
[All][Sg][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegnun            #; [All][Pl][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegnun            #; [All][Du][1DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtegnun          #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpenun             #; [All][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpenun             #; [All][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpenun             #;
[All][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegnun            #; [All][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegnun            #; [All][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpegnun            #;
[All][Sg][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesinun           #; [All][Pl][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesinun           #; [All][Du][2PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpesinun           #;
[All][Sg][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegnun          #; [All][Pl][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegnun          #; [All][Du][2DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpetegnun          #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}anun              #; [All][Pl][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}anun              #; [All][Du][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkenun             #;
[All][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itnun             #; [All][Pl][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itnun             #; [All][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itnun               #;
[All][Sg][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkenun           #; [All][Pl][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itnun             #; [All][Du][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itnun               #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][4SgPoss]:%^minun                     #; [All][Pl][4SgPoss]:%^minun                     #; [All][Du][4SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egminun             #;
[All][Sg][4PlPoss]:%^meggnun                   #; [All][Pl][4PlPoss]:%^meggnun                   #; [All][Du][4PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmeggnun           #;
[All][Sg][4DuPoss]:%^megtenun                  #; [All][Pl][4DuPoss]:%^megtenun                  #; [All][Du][4DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmegtenun          #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|

!---------------------------|
!          VIALIS           |
!---------------------------|-----------------------------|-------------------------------|
[Per][Sg]:%^kun            #; [Per][Pl]:%^%{.sf.%}etgun  #; [Per][Du]:%^%{.sf.%}egnegun  #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mkun        #; [Per][Pl][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mkun        #; [Per][Du][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemkun          #;
[Per][Sg][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mteggun     #; [Per][Pl][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mteggun     #; [Per][Du][1PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemteggun       #;
[Per][Sg][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   #; [Per][Pl][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   #; [Per][Du][1DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtegnegun     #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegun      #; [Per][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegun      #; [Per][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpegun          #;
[Per][Sg][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesigun    #; [Per][Pl][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesigun    #; [Per][Du][2PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpesigun        #;
[Per][Sg][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun #; [Per][Pl][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun #; [Per][Du][2DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpetegnegun     #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}akun     #; [Per][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}akun     #; [Per][Du][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkenkun          #;
[Per][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itgun    #; [Per][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itgun    #; [Per][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itgun          #;
[Per][Sg][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkenkun   #; [Per][Pl][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}akun     #; [Per][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itgun          #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][4SgPoss]:%^mikun     #; [Per][Pl][4SgPoss]:%^mikun     #; [Per][Du][4SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmikun         #;
[Per][Sg][4PlPoss]:%^megteggun #; [Per][Pl][4PlPoss]:%^megteggun #;  [Per][Du][4PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmegteggun     #;
[Per][Sg][4DuPoss]:%^megtegnegun #; [Per][Pl][4DuPoss]:%^megtegnegun #; [Per][Du][4DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmegtegnegun   #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|


!---------------------------|
!    EQUATIVE (equalis)     |
!---------------------------|-----------------------------|-------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg]:%^tun            #; [Equ][Pl]:%^%{.sf.%}estun  #; [Equ][Du]:%^%{.sf.%}egestun  #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtun        #; [Equ][Pl][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtun        #; [Equ][Du][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtun          #;
[Equ][Sg][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtestun     #; [Equ][Pl][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtestun     #; [Equ][Du][1PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtestun       #;
[Equ][Sg][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegestun   #; [Equ][Pl][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegestun   #; [Equ][Du][1DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtegestun     #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetun      #; [Equ][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetun      #; [Equ][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpetun          #;
[Equ][Sg][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesistun    #; [Equ][Pl][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesistun    #; [Equ][Du][2PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpesistun        #;
[Equ][Sg][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegetun #; [Equ][Pl][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegetun #; [Equ][Du][2DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpetegetun     #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}atun     #; [Equ][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}atun     #; [Equ][Du][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egketun          #;
[Equ][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itun    #; [Equ][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itun    #; [Equ][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itun          #;
[Equ][Sg][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egketun   #; [Equ][Pl][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itun     #; [Equ][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itun          #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][4SgPoss]:%^mitun     #; [Equ][Pl][4SgPoss]:%^mitun     #; [Equ][Du][4SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmitun         #;
[Equ][Sg][4PlPoss]:%^megestun #; [Equ][Pl][4PlPoss]:%^megestun #;  [Equ][Du][4PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmegestun     #;
[Equ][Sg][4DuPoss]:%^megestun #; [Equ][Pl][4DuPoss]:%^megestun #; [Equ][Du][4DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmegestun   #;
!----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
